it: Tipo di dispenser per alimenti: Cereali; Cereali; Pasta; Semi; Dolci; Altro
vi: Loại máy cấp liệu: Ngũ cốc; Ngũ cốc; Mì và ống nui; Hạt giống; Kẹo; Khác
tr: Yiyecek dispenseri türü: Hububat; Tahıl sirkesi; Makarna; Tohumlar; Tatlılar; Diğer
de: Lebensmittelspenderart: Getreide; Getreide; Pasta; Saatgut; Plüschtiere; Sonstiges
nb: Matdispensertype: Frokostblanding; Korn; Pasta; Frø; Søtsaker; Annet
sv: Matdispensertyp: Flingor; Spannmål; Pasta; Frön; Sötsaker; Övrigt
pl: Typ dozownika żywności: Zboża; Ziarna; Makaron; Nasiona; Słodycze; Inne
cs: Typ dávkovače potravin: Cereálie; Obilní; Pasta; Semena; Sladkosti; Jiné
th: ประเภทเครื่องจ่ายอาหาร: ซีเรียล; ธัญพืช; พาสต้า; เมล็ดพืช; ของหวาน; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta dozatora za hranu: Žitarice; Zrna; Tjestenina; Sjemenke; Slatkiši; Ostalo
el: Τύπος διανομέα τροφίμων: Δημητριακά; Σιτηρά; Ζυμαρικά; Σπόροι; Γλύκα; Άλλο
zh-TW: 食物分配器類型: 穀物; 穀物; 義大利麵; 種子; 糖果; 其他
es: Tipo de dispensador de alimentos: Cereales; Granos; Pasta; Semillas; Dulces; Otros
fr: Type de distributeur de nourriture: Céréales; Céréales; Pâtes; Graines; Bonbons; Autre
zh-CN: 食品分配器类型: 谷物; 谷物; 意大利面; 种子; 糖果; 其他
lt-LT: Maisto dozatoriaus tipas: Javainiai; Grūdai; Makaronai; Sėklos; Saldumynai; Kita
ja: フードディスペンサーの種類: シリアル; 穀類; パスタ; 種子; スイーツ; その他
ru: Тип диспенсера для сыпучих продуктов: Хлопья; Злаки; Паста; Семена; Сладости; Другой
bg-BG: Тип диспенсър за храна: Зърнени храни; Зърна; Паста; Семена; Сладкиши; Други
ro-RO: Tip dozator alimente: Cereale; Cereale; Paste; Semințe; Dulciuri; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de dispensador de alimentos: Cereais; Grãos; Massa; Sementes; Doces; Outro
hu: Élelmiszer-adagoló típusa: Müzli; Gabonafélék; Tészta; Magok; Édesség; Egyéb
nl: Voedselautomaatmateriaal: Granen; Granen; Pasta; Zaden; Snoepgoed; Andere
fi: Ruoka-automaattityyppi: Viljat; Vilja; Pasta; Siemenet; Makeiset; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta dozirnika živil: Kosmiči; Žitarice; Pasta; Semena; Sladkarije; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de dispensador de alimentos: Cereais; Grãos; Macarrão; Sementes; Doces; Outro
sk-SK: Typ dávkovača potravín: Obilniny; Obilie; Cestoviny; Semená; Sladkosti; Iné
da: Maddispensertype: Morgenmadsprodukter; Korn; Pasta; Frø; Søde sager; Andet
ko: 식품 디스펜서 유형: 시리얼; 곡물; 파스타; 종자; 스위츠; 기타
en: Food dispenser type: Cereals; Grains; Pasta; Seeds; Sweets; Other